Nebraska, session 109, LB119.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB119 LB119
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, program means the
Rural Health Opportunity Program that encourages students from rural
communities to pursue health care professions and return to practice in
those rural communities.
(2)(a) The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska shall enter into a
memorandum of understanding to administer the program, including a joint
application and interview process to select students to participate in
the program and be provisionally admitted into one of the eligible health
care programs at the University of Nebraska Medical Center.
(b) To be eligible, students shall:
(i) Attend, or be a graduate of, an approved or accredited high
school in Nebraska or receive an equivalent of a diploma of high school
equivalency in Nebraska; and
(ii) Have lived in, or been a resident of, a rural area of Nebraska
as determined by the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and
the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska.
(3) A student who participates in the program is entitled to a
waiver of one hundred percent of the cost of tuition and fees per
academic year for up to four years at a state college for the purpose of
completing the established health care program coursework at such state
college that is required for early admission and transfer to an eligible
health care program at the University of Nebraska Medical Center.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate a sufficient
amount of money for each fiscal year to carry out this section.
-2-